New Jersey, session 222, A2313.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2024, c.22, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 66 DEPARTMENT OF LAW AND PUBLIC SAFETY 10 Public Safety and Criminal Justice 19 Central Planning, Direction and Management GRANTS-IN-AID 13-1005  Homeland Security and Preparedness .............. $10,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Central Planning, Direction and Management                                    $10,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: 13    Unmanned Aircraft Systems Grant Program ($10,000,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.